Utah statutes.
13-10b-301.   Detention of suspect by owner or employee.

(1)  Any owner or employee who has probable cause to believe that an individual has unlawfully recorded a motion picture under Section 13-10b-201 may detain the individual, on or off the premises of the motion picture theater, in a reasonable manner and for a reasonable length of time to:

(a)  make reasonable inquiry as to whether the individual has in his possession a device that may reasonably be used in violation of Section 13-10b-201;

(b)  request identification;

(c)  verify the identification;

(d)  make a reasonable request of the individual to place or keep in full view any device that the employer or employee has reason to believe the individual may have used in violation of Section 13-10b-201; and

(e) (i)  inform a peace officer of the detention of the individual and surrender that individual to the custody of a peace officer; or

(ii)  in the case of a minor, inform a peace officer, the parents, or the legal guardian of this detention and to surrender custody of the minor to the responding individual.

(2)  An employer or employee may make a detention under Subsection (1) off the premises of the motion picture theater only if the detention is pursuant to the immediate pursuit of the individual that the employer or employee has reason to believe has violated Section 13-10b-201.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 2007 General Session

